test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_piehanj_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - piehânj: # ok
    piehânj+v2+N+Sg+Nom: piehânj
    piehânj+v2+N+Sg+Gen: piehânj
    piehânj+v2+N+Sg+Acc: piehânj
    piehânj+v2+N+Sg+Ill: pieˊhânjeh
    piehânj+v2+N+Sg+Loc: pieˊhânjij
    piehânj+v2+N+Sg+Com: pieˊhânjáin
    piehânj+v2+N+Sg+Abe: pieˊhâinttáá
    piehânj+v2+N+Ess: pieˊhânjin
    piehânj+v2+N+Par: pieˊhânjid
    piehânj+v2+N+Pl+Nom: pieˊhânjeh
    piehânj+v2+N+Pl+Gen: pieˊhânjij
    piehânj+v2+N+Pl+Acc: pieˊhânjijd
    piehânj+v2+N+Pl+Ill: pieˊhânjáid
    piehânj+v2+N+Pl+Loc: pieˊhânjijn
    piehânj+v2+N+Pl+Com: pieˊhânjijguin
    piehânj+v2+N+Pl+Abe: pieˊhânjijttáá
  
  Noun - kahhaanj: # ok
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Sg+Nom: kahhaanj 
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Sg+Gen: kahhaanj
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Sg+Acc: kahhaanj
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Sg+Ill: kahanjân
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Sg+Loc: kahanjist
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Sg+Com: kahanjáin
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Sg+Abe: kahhaanttáá
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Ess: kahanjin
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Par: kahanjid
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Pl+Nom: kahanjeh
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Pl+Gen: kahanjij
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Pl+Acc: kahanjijd
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Pl+Ill: kahanjáid
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Pl+Loc: kahanjijn
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Pl+Com: kahanjijguin
    kahhaanj+v2+N+Pl+Abe: kahanjijttáá


  Noun - vuolânj: # ok
    vuolânj+v2+N+Sg+Nom: vuolânj
    vuolânj+v2+N+Sg+Gen: vuolânj
    vuolânj+v2+N+Sg+Acc: vuolânj
    vuolânj+v2+N+Sg+Ill: vuoˊlânjân
    vuolânj+v2+N+Sg+Loc: vuoˊlânjist
    vuolânj+v2+N+Sg+Com: vuoˊlânjáin
    vuolânj+v2+N+Sg+Abe: vuolâinttáá
    vuolânj+v2+N+Ess: vuoˊlânjin
    vuolânj+v2+N+Par: vuoˊlânjid
    vuolânj+v2+N+Pl+Nom: vuoˊlânjeh
    vuolânj+v2+N+Pl+Gen: vuoˊlânjij
    vuolânj+v2+N+Pl+Acc: vuoˊlânjijd
    vuolânj+v2+N+Pl+Ill: vuoˊlânjáid
    vuolânj+v2+N+Pl+Loc: vuoˊlânjijn
    vuolânj+v2+N+Pl+Com: vuoˊlânjijguin
    vuolânj+v2+N+Pl+Abe: vuoˊlânjijttáá
    
  Noun - suoppânj: # ok
    suoppânj+v2+N+Sg+Nom: suoppânj
    suoppânj+v2+N+Sg+Gen: suoppânj
    suoppânj+v2+N+Sg+Acc: suoppânj
    suoppânj+v2+N+Sg+Ill: suoˊpânjân
    suoppânj+v2+N+Sg+Loc: suoˊpânjist
    suoppânj+v2+N+Sg+Com: suoˊpânjáin
    suoppânj+v2+N+Sg+Abe: suoppâinttáá
    suoppânj+v2+N+Ess: suoˊpânjin
    suoppânj+v2+N+Par: suoˊpânjid
    suoppânj+v2+N+Pl+Nom: suoˊpânjeh
    suoppânj+v2+N+Pl+Gen: suoˊpânjij
    suoppânj+v2+N+Pl+Acc: suoˊpânjijd
    suoppânj+v2+N+Pl+Ill: suoˊpânjáid
    suoppânj+v2+N+Pl+Loc: suoˊpânjijn
    suoppânj+v2+N+Pl+Com: suoˊpânjijguin
    suoppânj+v2+N+Pl+Abe: suoˊpânjijttáá

  Noun - kiäruin: # ok paradigm kiärun: kiärrun is in 
    kiärunj+v2+N+Sg+Nom: kiärunj 
    kiärunj+v2+N+Sg+Gen: kiärunj
    kiärunj+v2+N+Sg+Acc: kiärunj
    kiärunj+v2+N+Sg+Ill: kiäˊrunjân
    kiärunj+v2+N+Sg+Loc: kiäˊrunjist
    kiärunj+v2+N+Sg+Com: kiäˊrunjáin
    kiärunj+v2+N+Sg+Abe: kiäruinttáá
    kiärunj+v2+N+Ess: kiäˊrunjin
    kiärunj+v2+N+Par: kiäˊrunjid
    kiärunj+v2+N+Pl+Nom: kiäˊrunjeh
    kiärunj+v2+N+Pl+Gen: kiäˊrunjij
    kiärunj+v2+N+Pl+Acc: kiäˊrunjijd
    kiärunj+v2+N+Pl+Ill: kiäˊrunjáid
    kiärunj+v2+N+Pl+Loc: kiäˊrunjijn
    kiärunj+v2+N+Pl+Com: kiäˊrunjijguin
    kiärunj+v2+N+Pl+Abe: kiäˊrunjijttáá
